Illinois, session 104th, SB1948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 15-111 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/15-111)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 15-111)7    Sec. 15-111. Wheel and axle loads and gross weights. 8    (a) No vehicle or combination of vehicles with pneumatic 9tires may be operated, unladen or with load, when the total 10weight on the road surface exceeds the following: 20,000 11pounds on a single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle with no 12axle within the tandem exceeding 20,000 pounds; 80,000 pounds 13gross weight for vehicle combinations of 5 or more axles; or a 14total weight on a group of 2 or more consecutive axles in 15excess of that weight produced by the application of the 16following formula: W = 500 times the sum of (LN divided by N-1) 17+ 12N + 36, where "W" equals overall total weight on any group 18of 2 or more consecutive axles to the nearest 500 pounds, "L" 19equals the distance measured to the nearest foot between 20extremes of any group of 2 or more consecutive axles, and "N" 21equals the number of axles in the group under consideration.22    The above formula when expressed in tabular form results 23in allowable loads as follows:   SB1948- 2 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1Distance measured 2to the nearest 3foot between the 4extremes of any         Maximum weight in pounds 5group of 2 or           of any group of 6more consecutive        2 or more consecutive axles 7axles8feet2 axles3 axles4 axles5 axles6 axles9434,00010534,00011634,00012734,00013834,000*34,00014Between 8 15and 938,000 42,000 16939,00042,500171040,00043,500181144,000191245,00050,000201345,50050,500211446,50051,500221547,00052,000231648,00052,50058,000241748,50053,50058,500251849,50054,00059,000  SB1948- 3 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b11950,00054,50060,00022051,00055,50060,50066,00032151,50056,00061,00066,50042252,50056,50061,50067,00052353,00057,50062,50068,00062454,00058,00063,00068,50072554,50058,50063,50069,00082655,50059,50064,00069,50092756,00060,00065,00070,000102857,00060,50065,50071,000112957,50061,50066,00071,500123058,50062,00066,50072,000133159,00062,50067,50072,500143260,00063,50068,00073,000153364,00068,50074,000163464,50069,00074,500173565,50070,00075,000183666,000**70,50075,500193766,500**71,00076,000203867,500**72,00077,000213968,00072,50077,500224068,50073,00078,000234169,50073,50078,500244270,00074,00079,000254370,50075,00080,000264471,50075,500  SB1948- 4 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b14572,00076,00024672,50076,50034773,50077,50044874,00078,00054974,50078,50065075,50079,00075176,00080,00085276,50095377,500105478,000115578,500125679,500135780,00014*If the distance between 2 axles is 96 inches or less, the 2 15axles are tandem axles and the maximum total weight may not 16exceed 34,000 pounds, notwithstanding the higher limit 17resulting from the application of the formula.18**Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry 34,000 pounds 19each if the overall distance between the first and last axles 20of these tandems is 36 feet or more. 21    Vehicles not in a combination having more than 4 axles may 22not exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 4 23axles measured between the extreme axles of the vehicle.24    Vehicles in a combination having more than 6 axles may not 25exceed the weight in the table in this subsection (a) for 6 26axles measured between the extreme axles of the combination.  SB1948- 5 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1    Local authorities, with respect to streets and highways 2under their jurisdiction, without additional fees, may also by 3ordinance or resolution allow the weight limitations of this 4subsection, provided the maximum gross weight on any one axle 5shall not exceed 20,000 pounds and the maximum total weight on 6any tandem axle shall not exceed 34,000 pounds, on designated 7highways when appropriate regulatory signs giving notice are 8erected upon the street or highway or portion of any street or 9highway affected by the ordinance or resolution.10    The following are exceptions to the above formula:11        (1) Vehicles for which a different limit is 12    established and posted in accordance with Section 15-316 13    of this Code.14        (2) Vehicles for which the Department of 15    Transportation and local authorities issue overweight 16    permits under authority of Section 15-301 of this Code. 17    These vehicles are not subject to the bridge formula.18        (3) Cities having a population of more than 50,000 may 19    permit by ordinance axle loads on 2-axle motor vehicles 33 20    1/2% above those provided for herein, but the increase 21    shall not become effective until the city has officially 22    notified the Department of the passage of the ordinance 23    and shall not apply to those vehicles when outside of the 24    limits of the city, nor shall the gross weight of any 25    2-axle motor vehicle operating over any street of the city 26    exceed 40,000 pounds.  SB1948- 6 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1        (4) Weight limitations shall not apply to vehicles 2    (including loads) operated by a public utility when 3    transporting equipment required for emergency repair of 4    public utility facilities or properties or water wells.5        (4.5) A 3-axle or 4-axle vehicle (including when 6    laden) operated or hired by a municipality within Cook, 7    Lake, McHenry, Kane, DuPage, or Will county being operated 8    for the purpose of performing emergency sewer repair that 9    would be subject to a weight limitation less than 66,000 10    pounds under the formula in this subsection (a) shall have 11    a weight limitation of 66,000 pounds or the vehicle's 12    gross vehicle weight rating, whichever is less. This 13    paragraph (4.5) does not apply to vehicles being operated 14    on the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, 15    or to vehicles being operated on bridges or other elevated 16    structures constituting a part of a highway. 17        (5) Two consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a 18    total weight of 34,000 pounds each if the overall distance 19    between the first and last axles of the consecutive sets 20    of tandem axles is 36 feet or more, notwithstanding the 21    lower limit resulting from the application of the above 22    formula.23        (6) A truck, not in combination and used exclusively 24    for the collection of rendering materials, may, when 25    laden, transmit upon the road surface, except when on part 26    of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways,   SB1948- 7 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1    the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds on a single 2    axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle.3        (7) A truck not in combination, equipped with a self 4    compactor or an industrial roll-off hoist and roll-off 5    container, used exclusively for garbage, refuse, or 6    recycling operations, may, when laden, transmit upon the 7    road surface, except when on part of the National System 8    of Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 9    weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on 10    a tandem axle; 40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle 11    vehicle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. 12    This vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula.13        (7.5) A 3-axle rear discharge truck mixer registered 14    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the 15    mixing and transportation of concrete in the plastic 16    state, may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 17    except when on part of the National System of Interstate 18    and Defense Highways, the following maximum weights: 19    22,000 pounds on single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem 20    axle; 54,000 pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This 21    vehicle is not subject to the bridge formula. 22        (8) Except as provided in paragraph (7.5) of this 23    subsection (a), tandem axles on a 3-axle truck registered 24    as a Special Hauling Vehicle, manufactured prior to or in 25    the model year of 2024 and first registered in Illinois 26    prior to January 1, 2025, with a distance greater than 72   SB1948- 8 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1    inches but not more than 96 inches between any series of 2 2    axles, is allowed a combined weight on the series not to 3    exceed 36,000 pounds and neither axle of the series may 4    exceed 20,000 pounds. Any vehicle of this type 5    manufactured after the model year of 2024 or first 6    registered in Illinois after December 31, 2024 may not 7    exceed a combined weight of 34,000 pounds through the 8    series of 2 axles and neither axle of the series may exceed 9    20,000 pounds.10        A 3-axle combination sewer cleaning jetting vacuum 11    truck registered as a Special Hauling Vehicle, used 12    exclusively for the transportation of non-hazardous solid 13    waste, manufactured before or in the model year of 2014, 14    first registered in Illinois before January 1, 2015, may, 15    when laden, transmit upon the road surface, except when on 16    part of the National System of Interstate and Defense 17    Highways, the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds on 18    a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 54,000 19    pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle. This vehicle is 20    not subject to the bridge formula. 21        (9) A 4-axle truck mixer registered as a Special 22    Hauling Vehicle, used exclusively for the mixing and 23    transportation of concrete in the plastic state, and not 24    operated on a highway that is part of the National System 25    of Interstate Highways, is allowed the following maximum 26    weights: 20,000 pounds on any single axle; 36,000 pounds   SB1948- 9 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1    on a series of axles greater than 72 inches but not more 2    than 96 inches; and 34,000 pounds on any series of 2 axles 3    greater than 40 inches but not more than 72 inches. The 4    gross weight of this vehicle may not exceed the weights 5    allowed by the bridge formula for 4 axles. The bridge 6    formula does not apply to any series of 3 axles while the 7    vehicle is transporting concrete in the plastic state, but 8    no axle or tandem axle of the series may exceed the maximum 9    weight permitted under this paragraph (9) of subsection 10    (a).11        (10) Combinations of vehicles, registered as Special 12    Hauling Vehicles that include a semitrailer manufactured 13    prior to or in the model year of 2024, and registered in 14    Illinois prior to January 1, 2025, having 5 axles with a 15    distance of 42 feet or less between extreme axles, may not 16    exceed the following maximum weights: 20,000 pounds on a 17    single axle; 34,000 pounds on a tandem axle; and 72,000 18    pounds gross weight. This combination of vehicles is not 19    subject to the bridge formula. For all those combinations 20    of vehicles that include a semitrailer manufactured after 21    the effective date of P.A. 92-0417, the overall distance 22    between the first and last axles of the 2 sets of tandems 23    must be 18 feet 6 inches or more. Any combination of 24    vehicles that has had its cargo container replaced in its 25    entirety after December 31, 2024 may not exceed the 26    weights allowed by the bridge formula.  SB1948- 10 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1        (11) The maximum weight allowed on a vehicle with 2    crawler type tracks is 40,000 pounds.3        (12) A combination of vehicles, including a tow truck 4    and a disabled vehicle or disabled combination of 5    vehicles, that exceeds the weight restriction imposed by 6    this Code, may be operated on a public highway in this 7    State provided that neither the disabled vehicle nor any 8    vehicle being towed nor the tow truck itself shall exceed 9    the weight limitations permitted under this Chapter. 10    During the towing operation, neither the tow truck nor the 11    vehicle combination shall exceed 24,000 pounds on a single 12    rear axle and 44,000 pounds on a tandem rear axle, 13    provided the towing vehicle:14            (i) is specifically designed as a tow truck having 15        a gross vehicle weight rating of at least 18,000 16        pounds and is equipped with air brakes, provided that 17        air brakes are required only if the towing vehicle is 18        towing a vehicle, semitrailer, or tractor-trailer 19        combination that is equipped with air brakes;20            (ii) is equipped with flashing, rotating, or 21        oscillating amber lights, visible for at least 500 22        feet in all directions;23            (iii) is capable of utilizing the lighting and 24        braking systems of the disabled vehicle or combination 25        of vehicles; and26            (iv) does not engage in a tow exceeding 20 miles   SB1948- 11 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1        from the initial point of wreck or disablement. Any 2        additional movement of the vehicles may occur only 3        upon issuance of authorization for that movement under 4        the provisions of Sections 15-301 through 15-318 of 5        this Code. The towing vehicle, however, may tow any 6        disabled vehicle to a point where repairs are actually 7        to occur. This movement shall be valid only on State 8        routes. The tower must abide by posted bridge weight 9        limits.10        (12.5) The vehicle weight limitations in this Section 11    do not apply to a covered heavy duty tow and recovery 12    vehicle. The covered heavy duty tow and recovery vehicle 13    license plate must cover the operating empty weight of the 14    covered heavy duty tow and recovery vehicle only. 15        (13) Upon and during a declaration of an emergency 16    propane supply disaster by the Governor under Section 7 of 17    the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act:18            (i) a truck not in combination, equipped with a 19        cargo tank, used exclusively for the transportation of 20        propane or liquefied petroleum gas may, when laden, 21        transmit upon the road surface, except when on part of 22        the National System of Interstate and Defense 23        Highways, the following maximum weights: 22,000 pounds 24        on a single axle; 40,000 pounds on a tandem axle; 25        40,000 pounds gross weight on a 2-axle vehicle; 54,000 26        pounds gross weight on a 3-axle vehicle; and  SB1948- 12 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1            (ii) a truck when in combination with a trailer 2        equipped with a cargo tank used exclusively for the 3        transportation of propane or liquefied petroleum gas 4        may, when laden, transmit upon the road surface, 5        except when on part of the National System of 6        Interstate and Defense Highways, the following maximum 7        weights: 22,000 pounds on a single axle; 40,000 pounds 8        on a tandem axle; 90,000 pounds gross weight on a 9        5-axle or 6-axle vehicle.10        Vehicles operating under this paragraph (13) are not 11    subject to the bridge formula. 12        (14) A vehicle or combination of vehicles that uses 13    either natural gas or propane gas as a motor fuel or is 14    operated by an engine fueled wholly or partially by an 15    electric battery or hydrogen fuel cell electric fueling 16    system may exceed the above weight limitations by up to 17    2,000 pounds, the total allowance is calculated by an 18    amount that is equal to the difference between the weight 19    of the vehicle attributable to the natural gas or propane 20    gas tank and fueling system carried by the vehicle, and 21    the weight of a comparable diesel tank and fueling system. 22    This paragraph (14) shall not allow a vehicle to exceed 23    any posted weight limit on a highway or structure. 24        (15) An emergency vehicle or fire apparatus that is a 25    vehicle designed to be used under emergency conditions to 26    transport personnel and equipment, and used to support the   SB1948- 13 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1    suppression of fires and mitigation of other hazardous 2    situations on a Class I highway, may not exceed 86,000 3    pounds gross weight, or any of the following weight 4    allowances:5            (i) 24,000 pounds on a single steering axle;6            (ii) 33,500 pounds on a single drive axle;7            (iii) 62,000 pounds on a tandem axle; or8            (iv) 52,000 pounds on a tandem rear drive steer 9        axle. 10        (16) A bus, motor coach, or recreational vehicle may 11    carry a total weight of 24,000 pounds on a single axle, but 12    may not exceed other weight provisions of this Section. 13    Gross weight limits shall not apply to the combination of 14the tow truck and vehicles being towed. The tow truck license 15plate must cover the operating empty weight of the tow truck 16only. The weight of each vehicle being towed shall be covered 17by a valid license plate issued to the owner or operator of the 18vehicle being towed and displayed on that vehicle. If no valid 19plate issued to the owner or operator of that vehicle is 20displayed on that vehicle, or the plate displayed on that 21vehicle does not cover the weight of the vehicle, the weight of 22the vehicle shall be covered by the third tow truck plate 23issued to the owner or operator of the tow truck and 24temporarily affixed to the vehicle being towed. If a roll-back 25carrier is registered and being used as a tow truck, however, 26the license plate or plates for the tow truck must cover the   SB1948- 14 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1gross vehicle weight, including any load carried on the bed of 2the roll-back carrier.3    The Department may by rule or regulation prescribe 4additional requirements. However, nothing in this Code shall 5prohibit a tow truck under instructions of a police officer 6from legally clearing a disabled vehicle, that may be in 7violation of weight limitations of this Chapter, from the 8roadway to the berm or shoulder of the highway. If in the 9opinion of the police officer that location is unsafe, the 10officer is authorized to have the disabled vehicle towed to 11the nearest place of safety.12    For the purpose of this subsection, gross vehicle weight 13rating, or GVWR, means the value specified by the manufacturer 14as the loaded weight of the tow truck.15    (b) As used in this Section, "recycling haul" or 16"recycling operation" means the hauling of non-hazardous, 17non-special, non-putrescible materials, such as paper, glass, 18cans, or plastic, for subsequent use in the secondary 19materials market.20    (c) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 21pneumatic tires shall be operated, unladen or with load, upon 22the highways of this State in violation of the provisions of 23any permit issued under the provisions of Sections 15-301 24through 15-318 of this Chapter.25    (d) No vehicle or combination of vehicles equipped with 26other than pneumatic tires may be operated, unladen or with   SB1948- 15 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1load, upon the highways of this State when the gross weight on 2the road surface through any wheel exceeds 800 pounds per inch 3width of tire tread or when the gross weight on the road 4surface through any axle exceeds 16,000 pounds.5    (e) No person shall operate a vehicle or combination of 6vehicles over a bridge or other elevated structure 7constituting part of a highway with a gross weight that is 8greater than the maximum weight permitted by the Department, 9when the structure is sign posted as provided in this Section.10    (f) The Department upon request from any local authority 11shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an 12investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure 13constituting a part of a highway, and if it finds that the 14structure cannot with safety to itself withstand the weight of 15vehicles otherwise permissible under this Code the Department 16shall determine and declare the maximum weight of vehicles 17that the structures can withstand, and shall cause or permit 18suitable signs stating maximum weight to be erected and 19maintained before each end of the structure. No person shall 20operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles over any 21structure with a gross weight that is greater than the posted 22maximum weight.23    (g) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation 24of subsection (e) or (f) of this Section, proof of the 25determination of the maximum allowable weight by the 26Department and the existence of the signs, constitutes   SB1948- 16 -LRB104 11990 LNS 22084 b1conclusive evidence of the maximum weight that can be 2maintained with safety to the bridge or structure.3(Source: P.A. 102-124, eff. 7-23-21.)